Illinois, session 104th, HB3955.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The amount of $1,510,000, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the State Universities Civil Service System to meet 8its operational expenses for the fiscal year ending June 30, 92026. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112025.